Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.04.010

Corporate name.

A corporate name must comply with the requirements of Article 3 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2114; 2012 c 215 s 18; 1998 c 102 s 1; 1994 c 211 s 1304. Prior: 1991 c 269 s 36; 1991 c 72 s 32; 1989 c 165 s 37.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Effective date—1994 c 211: See note following RCW 18.04.025.